Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1299
Abandoned motorboat, defined.

(1) A motorboat is abandoned:

(a) If left unattended for more than seven days on any public property;

(b) If left unattended for more than seven days on private property if left initially without permission of the owner;

(c) If left for more than seven days on private property after permission of the owner is terminated; or

(d) If left for more than thirty days in the custody of a law enforcement agency after the agency has sent a letter to the last-registered owner under section 37-12,102.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Public property means any public park, waterfront, or other state, county, or municipally owned property; and

(b) Private property means any privately owned property which is not included within the definition of public property.

(3) No motorboat subject to forfeiture under section 28-431 shall be deemed abandoned under this section.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 12.